Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.510

Unlawful practices—Penalty.

(1) The acts or omissions under this section are violations of this chapter.

(2) Any person who, by himself or herself, by his or her agent or employee, or as the agent or employee of another person, performs any one of the acts enumerated in (a) through (l) of this subsection is subject to a civil penalty of no more than five thousand dollars per violation per occurrence:

(a) Use or have in possession for the purpose of using for any commercial purpose a weighing or measuring instrument or device that is intentionally calculated to falsify any weight, measure, or count of any commodity, or to sell, offer, expose for sale or hire or have in possession for the purpose of selling or hiring an incorrect weighing or measuring instrument or device or any weighing or measuring instrument or device calculated to falsify any weight or measure.

(b) Knowingly use or have in possession for current use in the buying or selling of any commodity or thing, for hire or award, or in the computation of any basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight, measurement, or count, or in the determination of weight, measurement or count, when a charge is made for such determination, any incorrect weighing or measuring instrument or device.

(c) Dispose of any rejected weighing or measuring instrument or device in a manner contrary to law or rule.

(d) Remove from any weighing or measuring instrument or device, contrary to law or rule, any tag, seal, stamp or mark placed thereon by the director or a city sealer.

(e) Sell, offer or expose for sale less than the quantity he or she represents of any commodity, thing or service.

(f) Take more than the quantity he or she represents of any commodity, thing, or service when, as buyer, he or she furnishes the weight, measure, or count by means of which the amount of the commodity, thing or service is determined.

(g) Keep for the purpose of sale, advertise, offer or expose for sale or sell any commodity, thing or service known to be in a condition or manner contrary to law or rule.

(h) Use in retail trade, except in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale and of medical prescriptions, a weighing or measuring instrument or device that is not so positioned that its indications may be accurately read and the weighing or measuring operation observable from some position which may reasonably be assumed by a customer.

(i) Knowingly approve or issue an official seal of approval for any weighing or measuring instrument or device known to be incorrect.

(j) Find a weighing or measuring instrument or device to be correct under RCW 19.94.255 when the person knows the instrument or device is incorrect.

(k) Fails to disclose to the department or a city sealer any knowledge of information relating to, or observation of, any device or instrument added to or modifying any weighing or measuring instrument or device for the purpose of selling, offering, or exposing for sale, less than the quantity represented of a commodity or calculated to falsify weight or measure, if the person is a service agent.

(l) Violate any other provision of this chapter or of the rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter for which a specific penalty has not been prescribed.

(3) Any person who, by himself or herself, by his or her agent or employee, or as the agent or employee of another person, violates RCW 19.94.390 as determined by the examination procedure adopted by or under RCW 19.94.390(2) is subject to a civil penalty of no more than two thousand dollars per violation per occurrence.

(4) Any person who, by himself or herself, by his or her agent or employee, or as the agent or employee of another person, performs any of the following acts is subject to a civil penalty of no more than ten thousand dollars per violation per occurrence:

(a) Knowingly adds to or modifies any weighing or measuring instrument or device by the addition of a device or instrument that would allow the sale, or the offering or exposure for sale, of less than the quantity represented of a commodity or falsification of weight or measure.

(b) Commits as a fourth or subsequent violation any of the acts listed in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

[ 2019 c 96 s 17; 1995 c 355 s 21; 1992 c 237 s 35; 1969 c 67 s 51.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.